North Dakota statutes. TITLE 61 Waters
CHAPTER 61-30 Lake Protection and Rehabilitation [Repealed]

61-30-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 634, § 1; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; repealed by 2019, ch. 216, § 5, effective April 29, 2019.

61-30-02.
Eligibility and priority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 634, § 2; repealed by 2019, ch. 216, § 5, effective April 29, 2019.

61-30-03.
Grants. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 634, § 3; repealed by 2019, ch. 216, § 5, effective April 29, 2019.

61-30-04.
Public access. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 634, § 4; repealed by 2019, ch. 216, § 5, effective April 29, 2019.

61-30-05.
Conservation district plan. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 634, § 5; repealed by 2019, ch. 216, § 5, effective April 29, 2019.